zh-TW: 通訊協議: 乙太網路; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; 序列; USB; 其他
pt-PT: Protocolos de comunicação: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Em série; USB; Outro
fi: Tiedonsiirtoprotokollat: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriaali; USB; Muu
hu: Kommunikációs protokollok: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Soros; USB; Egyéb
bg-BG: Комуникационни протоколи: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Сериен; USB; Други
cs: Komunikační protokoly: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Sériová; USB; Jiné
da: Kommunikationsprotokoller: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriel; USB; Andet
ru: Протокол передачи данных: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Последовательный; USB; Другое
sl-SI: Komunikacijski protokoli: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serial; USB; Drugo
th: เกณฑ์วิธีการสื่อสาร: อีเทอร์เน็ต; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; แบบอนุกรม; USB; อื่นๆ
pl: Protokoły komunikacyjne: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Szeregowe; USB; Inne
nb: Kommunikasjonsprotokoller: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriell; USB; Annet
es: Protocolos de comunicación: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serie; USB; Otros
ja: 通信プロトコル: イーサネット; Modbus; Profibus; PROFINET; シリアル; USB; その他
zh-CN: 通讯协议: 以太网; Modbus; 现场总线; Profinet; 串行; USB; 其他
ko: 통신 프로토콜: 이더넷; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; 시리얼; USB; 기타
hr-HR: Komunikacijski protokoli: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serijski; USB; Ostalo
pt-BR: Protocolos de comunicação: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serial; USB; Outro
sk-SK: Komunikačné protokoly: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Sériový; USB; Iné
el: Πρωτόκολλα επικοινωνίας: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Σειριακή; USB; Άλλο
tr: İletişim protokolleri: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seri; USB; Diğer
it: Protocolli di comunicazione: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriale; USB; Altro
de: Kommunikationsprotokolle: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriell; USB; Sonstiges
vi: Giao thức truyền thông: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Tạp chí; USB; Khác
sv: Kommunikationsprotokoll: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Seriell; USB; Övrigt
fr: Protocoles de communication: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Série; USB; Autre
nl: Communicatieprotocollen: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serieel; USB; Andere
en: Communication protocols: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serial; USB; Other
lt-LT: Ryšio protokolai: Eternetas; „Modbus“; „Profibus“; „Profinet“; Serijinis; USB; Kita
ro-RO: Protocoale de comunicare: Ethernet; Modbus; Profibus; Profinet; Serial; USB; Altele